Hawaii statutes.
[§353-65.5] Reports to county clerk. Whenever
the paroling authority grants or revokes parole for any citizen of eighteen
years of age or over, the paroling authority, in each case, shall make and
promptly transmit to the clerk of the county in which the citizen resides, a
certificate showing the fact of the granting or revoking of parole within
twenty days after the granting or revoking of parole. The certificate shall
include:

(1) The name, date of birth, and social security
number of the citizen and any known aliases;

(2) The citizen's address or last known address; and

(3) The date of the grant or revocation of parole. [L
2006, c 253, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next